incubator/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.tr.dix.xml
      <pardef n="çık/mak__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arım</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ar<b/>mıyım</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mam</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mıyım</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arsın</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ar<b/>mısın</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsın</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mısın</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ar</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ar<b/>mı</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mı</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ar<b/>mıyız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mayız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mıyız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arsınız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ar<b/>mısınız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsınız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mısınız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arlar</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>arlar<b/>mı</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlar</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlar<b/>mı</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>

      <e lm="adamak"><i>ada</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="anmak"><i>an</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="asmak"><i>as</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="aşmak"><i>aş</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="atmak"><i>at</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="azmak"><i>az</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="bıkmak"><i>bık</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="boğmak"><i>boğ</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="buyurmak"><i>buyur</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="coşmak"><i>coş</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="çakmak"><i>çak</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="çalmak"><i>çal</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="çarpmak"><i>çarp</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="çıkmak"><i>çık</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dalmak"><i>dal</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dolmak"><i>dol</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="donmak"><i>don</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="doymak"><i>doy</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="duymak"><i>duy</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kanmak"><i>kan</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kapmak"><i>kap</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="katmak"><i>kat</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kılmak"><i>kıl</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kırkmak"><i>kırk</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kırpmak"><i>kırp</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kısmak"><i>kıs</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kıymak"><i>kıy</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kızmak"><i>kız</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kurmak"><i>kur</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="saçmak"><i>saç</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sağmak"><i>sağ</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="salmak"><i>sal</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sapmak"><i>sap</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sarkmak"><i>sark</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="savmak"><i>sav</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="saymak"><i>say</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sızmak"><i>sız</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="şaşmak"><i>şaş</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="taşmak"><i>taş</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="tutmak"><i>tut</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="uçmak"><i>uç</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ummak"><i>um</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yağmak"><i>yağ</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yakmak"><i>yak</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yanmak"><i>yan</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yaymak"><i>yay</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yazmak"><i>yaz</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yığmak"><i>yığ</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yıkmak"><i>yık</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yırtmak"><i>yırt</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yontmak"><i>yont</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yormak"><i>yor</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yummak"><i>yum</i><par n="çık/mak__vblex"/></e>
